Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4289.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202b. (1) An employer that employs 2 or more individuals at any time during a calendar year in this state shall inform employees of, and keep posted at the employer's work site in a conspicuous place where employees may conveniently read it, a notice that includes all of the following information: (a) A statement that it is illegal under federal law to pay employees different wages for the same work because of an employee's race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, genetic information, or disability. (b) A statement that it is illegal under the law of this state to pay employees different wages for the same work because of an employee's religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (c) A statement that an employee who believes the employee's employer has violated the law requiring equal pay may contact the department of civil rights. (d) The telephone number of the telephone line required under section 602(g) and the address of the website required under section 602(h). (2) The notice under subsection (1) must be in a form approved by the department. The department may include additional information in the notice regarding the rights of employees under the law of this state. (3) An employer that violates this section may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. Sec. 602. The department shall do all of the following: (a) Be responsible to the executive director, who shall be is the principal executive officer of the department and shall be is responsible for executing the policies of the commission. (b) Appoint necessary employees and agents and fix their compensation in accordance with civil service rules. The attorney general shall appear for and represent the department or the commission in a court having jurisdiction of a matter under this act. (c) Receive, initiate, investigate, conciliate, adjust, dispose of, issue charges, and hold hearings on complaints alleging a violation of this act, and approve or disapprove plans to correct past discriminatory practices which have caused or resulted in a denial of equal opportunity with respect to groups or persons protected by this act. When conducting an investigation under this subdivision regarding an alleged violation of article 2, the department shall follow procedures that ensure to the greatest extent reasonably possible the anonymity of an individual who alleges a violation of article 2 or assists or participates in the investigation of an alleged violation of article 2. (d) Require answers to interrogatories; , order the submission of books, papers, records, and other materials pertinent to a complaint; , and require the attendance of witnesses; , administer oaths; , take testimony; , and compel, through court authorization, compliance with its orders or an order of the commission. (e) Cooperate or contract with persons and state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, including agencies of the federal government and of other states. (f) Monitor the awarding and execution of contracts to ensure compliance by a contractor or a subcontractor with a covenant entered into or to be entered into pursuant to under section 209. (g) Maintain a telephone line, the sole purpose of which is to receive reports of violations of this act, that allows for anonymous reporting. The department shall follow procedures that ensure to the greatest extent reasonably possible the anonymity of an individual who reports a violation through the use of the telephone line. (h) Maintain a public website that includes all of the following: (i) Information about rights under this act. (ii) A link to an easy-to-use form for electronic reporting of a violation of this act. (iii) The prominent display of the telephone number of the telephone line required under subdivision (g). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.